pt-PT: Fonte do sinal: GPS; Acelerómetro interno (navegação estimada); Acionamento mecânico por cabo; Barramento OBD-II/CAN; Entrada do sensor de velocidade do veículo (VSS); Sensor de roda/efeito Hall; Outro
da: Signalkilde: GPS; Internt accelerometer (bestikregning); Mekanisk kabeltræk; OBD-II/CAN-bus; Input fra køretøjets hastighedssensor (VSS); Hjul/Hall-effekt-sensor; Andet
sk-SK: Zdroj signálu: GPS; Interný akcelerometer (výpočet polohy); Mechanický káblový pohon; Zbernica OBD-II/CAN; Vstup snímača rýchlosti vozidla (VSS); Snímač kolesa/Hallov snímač; Iné
es: Fuente de señal: GPS; Acelerómetro interno (navegación a estima); Transmisión por cable mecánico; Bus OBD-II/CAN; Entrada del sensor de velocidad del vehículo (VSS); Sensor de rueda/efecto Hall; Otro
el: Πηγή σήματος: GPS; Εσωτερικό επιταχυνσιόμετρο (αδρανειακή πλοήγηση); Μηχανική μετάδοση με καλώδιο; Δίαυλος OBD-II/CAN; Είσοδος αισθητήρα ταχύτητας οχήματος (VSS); Αισθητήρας τροχού/φαινομένου Hall; Άλλο
pt-BR: Fonte do sinal: GPS; Acelerômetro interno (navegação estimada); Acionamento por cabo mecânico; OBD-II/barramento CAN; Entrada de sensor de velocidade do veículo (VSS); Sensor de roda/efeito Hall; Outra
th: แหล่งสัญญาณ: GPS; มาตรวัดความเร่งภายใน (Dead Reckoning); การขับเคลื่อนด้วยสายเคเบิลกลไก; OBD-II/CAN bus; อินพุตเซนเซอร์วัดความเร็วรถยนต์ (VSS); เซนเซอร์ที่ล้อ/เซนเซอร์ฮอลล์เอฟเฟกต์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vir signala: GPS; Notranji pospeškomer (z navigacijo na slepo); Mehanski kabelski pogon; Vodilo OBD-II/CAN; Vhod senzorja hitrosti vozila (VSS); Senzor kolesa/Hallov senzor; Drugo
ja: 信号源: GPS; 内部加速度センサー (自律航法); 機械式ケーブルドライブ; OBD-II/CANバス; 車速センサー (VSS) 入力; ホイール/ホール効果センサー; その他
ko: 신호 출처: GPS; 내부 가속도계(추측 항법); 기계식 케이블 드라이브; OBD-II/CAN 버스; 차량 속도 센서(VSS) 입력; 휠/홀 효과 센서; 기타
hr-HR: Izvor signala: GPS; Unutarnji akcelerometar (slijepo računanje); Mehanički kabelski pogon; OBD-II / CAN sabirnica; Ulaz senzora brzine vozila (VSS); Senzor kotača / Hallov senzor; Ostalo
nb: Signalkilde: GPS; Internt akselerometer (dødregning); Mekanisk kabeldrift; OBD-II / CAN-buss; Inngang for kjøretøyhastighetssensor (VSS); Hjul- / hall-effekt-sensor; Annet
fi: Signaalin lähde: GPS; Sisäinen kiihtyvyysanturi (kulkureittilaskenta); Mekaaninen kaapeliveto; OBD-II / CAN-väylä; Ajoneuvon nopeusanturin (VSS) tulo; Pyörä/hall-anturi; Muu
it: Sorgente del segnale: GPS; Accelerometro interno (navigazione stimata); Trasmissione meccanica a cavo; Bus OBD-II/CAN; Input sensore di velocità del veicolo (VSS); Sensore ruota/effetto Hall; Altro
cs: Zdroj signálu: GPS; Interní akcelerometr (dead reckoning); Mechanický lanovod; Sběrnice OBD-II / CAN; Vstup snímače rychlosti vozidla (VSS); Snímač kola / Hallův snímač; Jiný
ru: Источник сигнала: GPS; Внутренний акселерометр (счисление пути); Механический тросовый привод; Шина OBD-II/CAN; Вход датчика скорости автомобиля (VSS); Колесный датчик/датчик Холла; Другое
nl: Signaalbron: GPS; Interne versnellingsmeter (gegist bestek); Mechanische kabelaandrijving; OBD-II/CAN-bus; Input van voertuigsnelheidssensor (VSS); Wiel-/hall-effect-sensor; Overig
ro-RO: Sursă de semnal: GPS; Accelerometru intern (navigație estimată); Acționare mecanică prin cablu; Magistrală OBD-II/CAN; Intrare senzor de viteză al vehiculului (VSS); Senzor de roată/efect Hall; Alta
bg-BG: Източник на сигнал: GPS; Вътрешен акселерометър (смятане на пътя); Механично жило; OBD-II/CAN шина; Вход от сензор за скорост на автомобила (VSS); Сензор на колелото/на Хол; Друг
zh-CN: 信号来源: GPS; 内部加速度计（航位推算）; 机械电缆驱动; OBD-II/CAN 总线; 车速传感器 (VSS) 输入; 车轮/霍尔效应传感器; 其他
vi: Nguồn tín hiệu: GPS; Gia tốc kế tích hợp (công nghệ dead reckoning); Dẫn động bằng cáp cơ học; OBD-II/CAN bus; Cảm biến tốc độ xe (VSS); Cảm biến bánh xe/cảm biến hiệu ứng Hall; Khác
fr: Source du signal: GPS; Accéléromètre interne (navigation à l’estime); Entraînement par câble mécanique; Bus CAN/OBD-II; Entrée du capteur de vitesse du véhicule (VSS); Capteur de roue/à effet Hall; Autre
en: Signal source: GPS; Internal accelerometer (dead reckoning); Mechanical cable drive; OBD-II/CAN bus; Vehicle speed sensor (VSS) input; Wheel/hall-effect sensor; Other
de: Signalquelle: GPS; Interner Beschleunigungsmesser (Koppelnavigation); Mechanischer Seilzug; OBD-II/CAN-Bus; Eingang für Fahrzeuggeschwindigkeitssensor (VSS); Rad-/Hall-Effekt-Sensor; Andere
hu: Jelforrás: GPS; Belső gyorsulásmérő (tehetetlenségi navigáció); Mechanikus kábeles hajtás; OBD-II/CAN-busz; Jármű sebességérzékelő (VSS) bemenet; Kerék-/Hall-effektus szenzor; Egyéb
sv: Signalkälla: GPS; Intern accelerometer (död räkning); Mekanisk vajerdrift; OBD-II/CAN-buss; Hastighetssensorinmatning (VSS); Hjul-/hallsensor; Övrigt
pl: Źródło sygnału: GPS; Wewnętrzny akcelerometr (zliczanie drogi); Mechaniczny napęd linkowy; OBD-II / magistrala CAN; Wejście czujnika prędkości pojazdu (VSS); Czujnik koła / zjawiska Halla; Inne
zh-TW: 訊號來源: GPS; 內部加速度計 (航位推算); 機械纜線驅動; OBD-II/CAN 匯流排; 車速感測器 (VSS) 輸入; 車輪/霍爾效應感測器; 其他
lt-LT: Signalo šaltinis: GPS; Vidinis akcelerometras (skaičiuojamoji navigacija); Mechaninė troso pavara; OBD-II / CAN magistralė; Transporto priemonės greičio jutiklio (VSS) įvestis; Rato / Holo efekto jutiklis; Kita
tr: Sinyal kaynağı: GPS; Dahili ivmeölçer (konum tahmini); Mekanik kablo tahriki; OBD-II/CAN veri yolu; Araç hız sensörü (VSS) girişi; Tekerlek/hall etkisi sensörü; Diğer